Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. In General

§ 21-20-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as “The Boards of Cooperative Educational Services Act”.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 105, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-501; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-5-101

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” as used in this section, see § 21-20-103(a)(iv).

§ 21-20-102.
Purpose.

The purpose of this act is to provide a method whereby school districts and community college districts or any combination may work together and cooperate to provide educational services, including but not limited to postsecondary education, career and technical education, adult education and services for children with disabilities, when the services can be more effectively provided through a cooperative effort. Educational services provided under this act by or in cooperation with public schools shall be subject to the standards for educational programs imposed under W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

, and by rule and regulation of the state board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 105, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21-502; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-5-102; Laws 1989, ch. 248, § 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 301(a); 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "career and technical" for "vocational-technical" in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 21-20-103(a)(iv).

§ 21-20-103.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Assessed value” means the total assessed value of the member school district or community college district;

“Board of trustees” means the board of trustees of any school district within the state or the community college district board of any community college within the state;

“Post secondary education” means education programs offered by any accredited Wyoming college, the University of Wyoming or any accredited college or university outside of Wyoming if services are unavailable in Wyoming;

“This act” means W.S.

21-20-101

through

21-20-111

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 105, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21-503; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-5-103; Laws 1989, ch. 248, § 2; 1997, ch. 113, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-20-104.
Board of cooperative educational services; generally.

If two (2) or more boards of trustees desire to establish a board of cooperative services for the purpose of providing cooperative educational services and if the services can be provided more effectively through a cooperative effort, the boards of trustees of the interested districts, a majority of whose members respectively vote in favor of doing so, may enter into an agreement to form a board of cooperative educational services. The agreement shall specify among other things the length of term of the agreement, the rights, responsibilities and obligations of each participating district, the types of services to be rendered, the procedure for the establishment of additional services and the procedure for the inclusion of additional districts within the cooperative educational services program. The agreement shall also provide a method for the amendment and dissolution of the agreement with the consent of each participating district. Any agreement to form a board of cooperative educational services entered into between the participating districts shall be approved by the state board of education.

The boards of trustees agreeing to participate in the board of cooperative educational services shall appoint members of the participating boards of trustees to a board of cooperative educational services. The appointed board shall be composed of not less than five (5) nor more than nine (9) members unless there are more than nine (9) districts participating in which event each participating district shall have one (1) member. Each participating board of trustees shall have at least one (1) member appointed to the board of cooperative educational services. The terms of office of each of the members of the board of cooperative educational services shall be coterminous with their respective terms of office upon their boards of trustees. As the terms of office expire, or as vacancies occur, new members of the board of cooperative educational services shall be appointed by the board of trustees of the participating district.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 105, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 21-504; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-5-104; Laws 1989, ch. 248, § 2; 2000, ch. 73, § 1; 2001, ch. 161, § 1.

Board is “governmental entity” for purpose of Wyoming Governmental Claims Act

(chapter 39 of title 1), and the board's employees are not school district employees whose liability could be imputed to the district. Sykes v. Lincoln County Sch. Dist., 763 P.2d 1263,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 21-20-105.
Board of cooperative educational services; chairman, vice-chairman, clerk and treasurer; meetings.

At its first meeting, the members of the board of cooperative educational services elected as set forth in W.S. 21-20-104(b) shall proceed to elect from their membership a chairman, a vice-chairman, a clerk, and a treasurer, whose terms of office shall be for one (1) year unless their terms of office as school board members expire earlier. The duties of the chairman, vice-chairman, clerk and treasurer of the board of cooperative educational services shall be the same as the duties provided by law for similar offices of boards of trustees of school districts within this state insofar as they are applicable. Except as specifically provided herein, meetings of the board of cooperative educational services shall be called, held and conducted as provided by law for the meeting of the boards of trustees of school districts within this state. Notwithstanding W.S. 21-3-110(a)(iv), the board of cooperative educational services shall meet quarterly and at other times as may be desirable upon call of the chairman. The board shall not be required to meet at least one (1) time per month.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 105, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 21-505; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-5-105; 2015 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to officers and meetings of school district boards of trustees, see chapter 3 of this title.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Except as specifically provided herein, meetings” for “Meetings” at the beginning of the third sentence and added the fourth and fifth sentences.

§ 21-20-106.
Cost of facilities, equipment and services.

Except as provided under W.S. 21-20-110(g) for revenues generated from any additional special school district tax, the costs of facilities, equipment and services performed under the direction of the board of cooperative educational services shall be financed by participating districts on a basis agreed upon by the boards of trustees of the participating districts.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 105, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 21-506; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-5-106; Laws 1989, ch. 248, § 2.

§ 21-20-107.
Powers and duties of board of cooperative educational services.

Each board of trustees of cooperative educational services shall:

Prescribe and enforce rules, regulations and policies for its own government and for the government of the services and affairs under its jurisdiction which are consistent with the laws of the state;

Keep minutes of all meetings at which official action is taken and a record of all official acts which are public records;

Be responsible for such programs and services as shall be provided by joint agreement of the boards of trustees involved in the cooperative educational programs;

Administer and abide by the terms of the agreement or agreements entered into by the participating districts.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 105, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 21-507; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-5-107.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-20-108.
Powers and duties of board of cooperative educational services; property; contracts; gifts, grants, bequests or devises; employment and discharge of personnel; expenses; bonding of employees.

Each board of trustees of cooperative educational services may:

Hold, convey, lease, rent and manage property;

Except as provided by paragraph (a)(iii) of this section, contract for educational and related services with any other agency;

Contract for post secondary education services with any accredited Wyoming college or the University of Wyoming or if services are unavailable in Wyoming, with an accredited college or university outside of Wyoming;

Accept or reject any federal or other gift, grant, bequest or devise;

Discharge any employee;

Employ any personnel needed to perform the services for which the board of cooperative services is formed;

Receive and spend funds and provide for the necessary expenses of the board incurred in the exercise of its powers and performance of its duties;

Require any employee responsible for funds or property of the board to be bonded under suitable bond indemnifying the board against loss, for an amount and of a type determined by the board;

Provide insurance under the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan pursuant to W.S. 9-3-201(e), for board employees meeting the definition of employee under W.S. 9-3-203(a)(iv), as provided by W.S.

9-3-202

through

9-3-218

. Each participating board of cooperative educational services shall report to the department of administration and information as specified by W.S. 9-3-201(e) and make payments for employer and employee contributions as provided by W.S.

9-3-210

and

9-3-211

. The amount of contributions paid under W.S.

9-3-211

for each employee electing coverage shall be deducted from the employee’s monthly salary in accordance with W.S. 9-3-211. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit the board’s authority to provide insurance for its employees as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 204, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-508; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-5-108; Laws 1989, ch. 248, § 2; 2014 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in the second sentence in (a)(ix), substituted “specified by W.S. 9-3-201(e)” for “specified by W.S. 9-3-205(e).”

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-20-109.
Special school district tax for board of cooperative educational services; election not required; determination of levy amount.

For the purpose of maintaining programs offered by a board of cooperative educational services, the school districts comprising the board may levy a special school district tax not to exceed one-half (1/2) mill on the assessed value of the member districts. The vote of the electors within the member districts shall not be required for the tax levy.

The amount of the mill levy shall be determined on the basis of a predetermined formula based upon a participating district’s total enrollment, ascertained by the board and ratified by at least three-fourths (3/4) of the participating boards. The assessment shall raise only the necessary funds to meet the financial requirements of programs and services offered.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 248, §§ 2, 3.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 19, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-5-109; Laws 1979, ch. 80, § 1; 1989, ch. 248, §§ 2, 3.

§ 21-20-110.
Additional special school district tax; election; limitations; special community college district levy.

The school districts comprising any board of cooperative educational services established under this act and providing post secondary education services may impose an additional special school district levy not to exceed two (2) mills on the assessed value of the member districts. Any additional levy imposed under this section is in addition to any tax levied under W.S.

21-20-109

.

Except as provided by subsection (h) of this section, no additional tax shall be levied under this section until a proposition to impose the levy is submitted to a vote of the qualified electors of the member school districts comprising the board and a majority of all votes cast within the member districts vote in favor of imposing the additional tax levy. The proposition to impose the additional levy shall be submitted at an election held on a date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

. The board shall publish notice of the election within a newspaper of general circulation in the affected districts and the election shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures provided by W.S.

22-22-301

through

22-22-304

. Each member school district shall pay all costs incident to the election within its district or if a concurrent election, an equally proportioned share of the costs as determined by the county clerk.

At the election, the ballot shall contain the words “for the . . . . . mill (not to exceed two (2) mills) additional special school district tax for maintenance of post secondary education services offered by the . . . . . Board of Cooperative Educational Services” and “against the . . . . . mill (not to exceed two (2) mills) additional special school district tax for maintenance of post secondary education services offered by the . . . . . Board of Cooperative Educational Services”.

Each county clerk of the counties involved shall immediately give notice of the election results to the county commissioners and if the proposition is authorized by the electors of all participating school districts, each involved county commission shall levy the additional special school district tax in the manner provided by law.

If the additional tax levy is approved, the proposition of continuing the additional special school district levy shall be submitted by the board at each second general election following approval of the proposition until the proposition for continuing the additional levy is defeated. The ballot shall contain the words “for continuing the . . . . . mill (not to exceed two (2) mills) additional special school district tax for maintenance of post secondary education services offered by the . . . . . Board of Cooperative Educational Services” and “against continuing the . . . . . mill (not to exceed two (2) mills) additional special school district tax for maintenance of post secondary education services offered by the . . . . . Board of Cooperative Educational Services”.

If the proposition to impose or continue the increased tax is defeated, the proposition shall not again be submitted to electors of the member school districts for at least eleven (11) months. If the proposition is defeated at any general election following initial adoption of the additional tax, the tax is repealed effective December 31 of that calendar year in which defeated and the levy imposed by the county commissioners for the following calendar year shall not exceed the levy authorized under W.S.

21-20-109

.

Revenues generated from any additional special school district levy under this section shall not be:

Considered as a part of any local revenues to be included in any community college district budget or as a part of the operating budget of the University of Wyoming, except for tuition and fees collected for post secondary education services offered by and included within the budget of any community college or the University of Wyoming. The revenues shall be identified in the community college biennial funding report under W.S. 21-18-205(b); or

Used for building any capital construction project.

In addition to subsection (a) of this section, the board of trustees of any community college district participating in an agreement under W.S.

21-20-104

may levy a special levy of not to exceed one-half (1/2) mill on the assessed value of the district for a period not to exceed two (2) years. Any levy imposed under this subsection shall be used solely for purposes of maintaining programs offered by the board of cooperative educational services of which the district is a participant and when combined with any levy imposed under subsection (a) of this section, shall not exceed two (2) mills. A determination by the board to impose the levy shall be made at a regular or special meeting following a public hearing announced by the board. Any tax imposed under this subsection may be renewed by the board for an additional two (2) years subject to public hearing requirements specified under this subsection. Revenues collected under this subsection shall be identified as district revenue in the biennial funding report of the district under W.S. 21-18-205(b) but shall not be restricted by the commission in any manner.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 248, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1997, ch. 113, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2000, ch. 33, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-20-103(a)(iv).

§ 21-20-111.
Special school district taxes; in addition to existing district tax limitations; distribution of tax revenues; withdrawal from participation.

Any special school district tax imposed under W.S.

21-20-109

and any additional special school district tax imposed under W.S.

21-20-110

shall be in addition to the tax limitations imposed under W.S.

21-13-102

.

Revenues generated from any special school district tax levy imposed under W.S.

21-20-109

and

21-20-110

shall be distributed to the appropriate board of cooperative educational services and shall be deducted from the total operating costs when assessing tuition and maintenance costs for participating districts. In addition and in accordance with W.S.

21-20-110

(g), revenues generated under any additional tax levied under W.S. 21-20-110 shall be restricted to necessary operating expenses connected with maintaining post secondary education services.

One (1) year advance notice shall be provided by any participating school district board of trustees before withdrawing from funding any cooperative educational services.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 248, § 1.